hi-nouns.aff
FLAG num

# hi-noun9
SFX 12 Y 2
SFX 12 ा े ा
SFX 12 ा ोँ ा

# hi-noun8
SFX 13 Y 2
SFX 13 0 एँ ा
SFX 13 0 ओँ ा

# hi-noun7
SFX 14 Y 1
SFX 14 0 ओँ ा

# hi-noun6
SFX 15 Y 2
SFX 15 0 ेँ .
SFX 15 0 ोँ .

# hi-noun5
SFX 16 Y 1
SFX 16 0 ोँ .

# hi-noun4
SFX 17 Y 2
SFX 17 ी ियाँ ी
SFX 17 ी िओँ ी

# hi-noun4a
SFX 18 Y 3
SFX 18 ी िओँ ी
SFX 18 ई इओँ ई
SFX 18 ई इयाँ ई

# hi-noun3
SFX 19 Y 2
SFX 19 ि ियाँ ि
SFX 19 ि िओँ ि

# hi-noun3a
SFX 20 Y 1
SFX 20 ि िओँ ि

# hi-noun2
SFX 21 Y 3
SFX 21 ू ुओँ ू
SFX 21 ु ुओँ ु
SFX 21 0 ओँ ौ

# hi-noun1
